test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-cealkked_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ceäʹlǩǩed: # Verb 'to say/sanoa' - full paradigm
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ceälkam
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ceälkak
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceälkk
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ceäʹlǩǩep
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ceäʹlǩǩveʹted
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ceäʹlǩǩe
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: cieʹlǩet
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: cieʹlǩ
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cieʹlǩǩem
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: cieʹlǩǩiǩ
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: cieʹlǩi
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [cieʹlǩim, cieʹlǩin]
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: cieʹlǩid
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cieʹlǩǩe
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: cieʹlǩǩeš
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ceälkkam
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pot+Sg1: cieʹlǩžem
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pot+Sg2: cieʹlǩžiǩ
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pot+Sg3: cieʹlǩež
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pot+Pl1: [cieʹlǩžep, cieʹlǩžim, cieʹlǩžin]
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pot+Pl2: cieʹlǩžid 
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pot+Pl3: cieʹlǩže
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pot+Sg4: cieʹlǩžet
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pot+ConNeg: cieʹlǩže
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Cond+Sg1: ceälkčem
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Cond+Sg2: [ceälkčiǩ, ceälkčeǩ]
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Cond+Sg3: ceälkči
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Cond+Pl1: [ceälkčim, ceälkčin, ceälkčep]
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Cond+Pl2: ceälkčid
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Cond+Pl3: ceälkče
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Cond+Sg4: ceälkčeš
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Cond+ConNeg: ceälkče
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Imprt+Sg2: cieʹlǩ
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Imprt+Sg3: ceälkas
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Imprt+Pl1: ceäʹlǩǩep
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Imprt+Pl2: ceäʹlǩǩed
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Imprt+Pl3: ceälkkaz
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Imprt+ConNeg: cieʹlǩ
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: ciâlkku
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Actio+Ess: ceäʹlǩǩmen
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Actio: ceäʹlǩǩem
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Act+PrsPrc: cieʹlǩǩi
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Act+PrfPrc: ceälkkam
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: ciâlkkum
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+VAbess: [cieʹlǩkani, cieʹlǩǩânai, cieʹlǩǩeânnai, cieʹlǩǩâni, cieʹlǩǩeânai, cieʹlǩǩenai, cieʹlǩǩani, cieʹlǩkâni]
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ger+Ess: cieʹlǩeeʹn
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Ger+Instr: cieʹlǩeeʹl
     ceäʹlǩǩed+V+Inf: ceäʹlǩǩed
